Illinois, session 104th, SB2941.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regional Transportation Authority Act is 5amended by changing Section 4.03.3 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 3615/4.03.3)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)8    Sec. 4.03.3. Distribution of Revenues. This Section 9applies only after the Department begins administering and 10enforcing an increased tax under Section 4.03(m) as authorized 11by this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. After 12providing for payment of its obligations with respect to bonds 13and notes issued under the provisions of Section 4.04 and 14obligations related to those bonds and notes and separately 15accounting for the tax on aviation fuel deposited into the 16Local Government Aviation Trust Fund, the Authority shall 17disburse the remaining proceeds from taxes it has received 18from the Department of Revenue under this Article IV and the 19remaining proceeds it has received from the State under 20Section 4.09(a) as follows:21    (a) With respect to taxes imposed by the Authority under 22Section 4.03, after withholding 15% of 80% of the receipts 23from those taxes collected in Cook County at a rate of 1.25%,   SB2941- 2 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b115% of 75% of the receipts from those taxes collected in Cook 2County at the rate of 1%, 15% of one-half of the receipts from 3those taxes collected in DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will 4Counties, and 15% of money received by the Authority from the 5Regional Transportation Authority Occupation and Use Tax 6Replacement Fund or from the Regional Transportation Authority 7tax fund created in Section 4.03(n), the Board shall allocate 8the proceeds and money remaining to the Service Boards as 9follows: 10        (1) an amount equal to (i) 85% of 80% of the receipts 11    from those taxes collected within the City of Chicago at a 12    rate of 1.25%, (ii) 85% of 75% of the receipts from those 13    taxes collected in the City of Chicago at the rate of 1%, 14    and (iii) 85% of the money received by the Authority on 15    account of transfers to the Regional Transportation 16    Authority Occupation and Use Tax Replacement Fund or to 17    the Regional Transportation Authority tax fund created in 18    Section 4.03(n) from the County and Mass Transit District 19    Fund attributable to retail sales within the City of 20    Chicago shall be allocated to the Chicago Transit 21    Authority; 22        (2) an amount equal to (i) 85% of 80% of the receipts 23    from those taxes collected within Cook County outside of 24    the City of Chicago at a rate of 1.25%, (ii) 85% of 75% of 25    the receipts from those taxes collected within Cook County 26    outside the City of Chicago at a rate of 1%, and (iii) 85%   SB2941- 3 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1    of the money received by the Authority on account of 2    transfers to the Regional Transportation Authority 3    Occupation and Use Tax Replacement Fund or to the Regional 4    Transportation Authority tax fund created in Section 5    4.03(n) from the County and Mass Transit District Fund 6    attributable to retail sales within Cook County outside of 7    the City of Chicago shall be allocated 30% to the Chicago 8    Transit Authority, 55% to the Commuter Rail Board, and 15% 9    to the Suburban Bus Board; and 10        (3) an amount equal to 85% of one-half of the receipts 11    from the taxes collected within the Counties of DuPage, 12    Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will shall be allocated 70% to 13    the Commuter Rail Board and 30% to the Suburban Bus Board. 14    (b) Moneys received by the Authority on account of 15transfers to the Regional Transportation Authority Occupation 16and Use Tax Replacement Fund from the State and Local Sales Tax 17Reform Fund shall be allocated among the Authority and the 18Service Boards as follows: 15% of such moneys shall be 19retained by the Authority and the remaining 85% shall be 20transferred to the Service Boards as soon as may be 21practicable after the Authority receives payment. Moneys which 22are distributable to the Service Boards pursuant to the 23preceding sentence shall be allocated among the Service Boards 24on the basis of each Service Board's distribution ratio. The 25term "distribution ratio" means, for purposes of this 26subsection (b), the ratio of the total amount distributed to a   SB2941- 4 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1Service Board pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 4.03.3 for 2the immediately preceding calendar year to the total amount 3distributed to all of the Service Boards pursuant to 4subsection (a) of Section 4.03.3 for the immediately preceding 5calendar year. 6    (c)(i) 20% of the receipts from those taxes collected in 7Cook County under Section 4.03 at the rate of 1.25%, (ii) 25% 8of the receipts from those taxes collected in Cook County 9under Section 4.03 at the rate of 1%, (iii) 50% of the receipts 10from those taxes collected in DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and 11Will Counties under Section 4.03, and (iv) amounts received 12from the State under Section 4.09 (a)(2) and items (i), (ii), 13and (iii) of Section 4.09 (a)(3) shall be allocated as 14follows: the amount required to be deposited into the ADA 15Paratransit Fund described in Section 2.01d, the amount 16required to be deposited into the Suburban Community Mobility 17Fund described in Section 2.01e, and the amount required to be 18deposited into the Innovation, Coordination and Enhancement 19Fund described in Section 2.01c, and the balance shall be 20allocated 48% to the Chicago Transit Authority, 39% to the 21Commuter Rail Board, and 13% to the Suburban Bus Board. 22    (d) Amounts received from the State under Section 4.09 23(a)(3)(iv) shall be distributed 100% to the Chicago Transit 24Authority. 25    (e) With respect to those taxes collected in DuPage, Kane, 26Lake, McHenry, and Will Counties and paid directly to the   SB2941- 5 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1counties under Section 4.03, the county board County Board of 2each county shall use those amounts to fund operating and 3capital costs of public safety operations, facilities of 4county law enforcement, and public transportation services and 5or facilities and or to fund operating, capital, right-of-way, 6construction, and maintenance costs of other transportation 7purposes, including road, bridge, public safety, and transit 8purposes intended to improve mobility or reduce congestion in 9the county. The funds shall be divided equally among all 10entities. The receipt of funding by such counties pursuant to 11this paragraph shall not be used as the basis for reducing any 12funds that such counties would otherwise have received from 13the State of Illinois, any agency or instrumentality thereof, 14the Authority, or the Service Boards.15    (f) The Authority by ordinance adopted by 12 of its then 16Directors shall apportion to the Service Boards funds provided 17by the State of Illinois under Section 4.09(a)(1) as it shall 18determine and shall make payment of the amounts to each 19Service Board as soon as may be practicable upon their receipt 20provided the Authority has adopted a balanced budget as 21required by Section 4.01 and further provided the Service 22Board is in compliance with the requirements in Section 4.11. 23    (g) Beginning January 1, 2009, before making any payments, 24transfers, or expenditures under this Section to a Service 25Board, the Authority must first comply with Section 4.02a or 264.02b of this Act, whichever may be applicable.   SB2941- 6 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1    (h) Moneys may be appropriated from the Public 2Transportation Fund to the Office of the Executive Inspector 3General for the costs incurred by the Executive Inspector 4General while serving as the inspector general for the 5Authority and each of the Service Boards. Beginning December 631, 2012, and each year thereafter, the Office of the 7Executive Inspector General shall annually report to the 8General Assembly the expenses incurred while serving as the 9inspector general for the Authority and each of the Service 10Boards. 11(Source: P.A. 101-604, eff. 12-13-19.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)13    Sec. 4.03.3. Distribution of Revenues. 14    (a) (Blank). 15    (b) (Blank). 16    (c) (Blank). 17    (d) (Blank). 18    (d-5) For fiscal years 2027, 2028, and 2029, the 19Authority, after making deductions to cover the Authority's 20expenses, including Administrative Operating Expenses, 21Regional Services Operating Expense, Program and Project 22Expenses, Joint Self-Insurance Fund, and debt service 23obligations, and the cost of ADA paratransit service shall 24allocate operating revenue from all sources as follows:25        (1) An amount to each Service Board equal to the   SB2941- 7 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1    amount of the total public funding and the federal relief 2    funding the Service Board received in Fiscal Year 2025 3    under the Regional Budget adopted by the Authority in 4    December 2024.5        (2) Any amount remaining after the distribution under 6    paragraph (1) shall be allocated to the Service Boards in 7    proportion to the sum of each Service Board's percentage 8    of:9            (A) vehicle revenue miles;10            (B) passenger miles traveled;11            (C) unlinked passenger trips; and12            (D) vehicle revenue hours.13    (d-10) The Board of the Authority may, by ordinance, 14adjust the amounts allocated to each of the Service Boards 15under paragraph (2) of subsection (d-5) if it finds that the 16allocation of funds under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection 17(d-5) has a disproportionately adverse impact on the service 18levels of any Service Board and shall make appropriate 19adjustments to address the disproportionate adverse impact.20    (d-15) For fiscal years 2030, 2031, and 2032, the 21Authority, after making deductions to cover the Authority's 22expenses, including Administrative Operating Expenses, 23Regional Services Operating Expense, Program and Project 24Expenses, Joint Self-Insurance Fund, and debt service 25obligations and the cost of ADA paratransit service, shall 26allocate operating revenue from all sources to each Service   SB2941- 8 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1Board in an amount equal to the amount of the total public 2funding and federal relief funding the Service Board received 3in Fiscal Year 2025 under the Annual Budget and 2-Year 4Financial Plan adopted by the Authority in December 2024. Any 5amount remaining after the distribution under subsection 6(d-10) shall be allocated to the Service Boards by the 7Authority under the service standards.8    (d-20) For Fiscal Year 2033 and each fiscal year 9thereafter, the Authority, after making deductions to cover 10the Authority's expenses, shall allocate operating revenue 11from all sources to the Service Boards under the service 12standards. 13    (d-25) The allocation of funds for any fiscal year shall 14be sufficient to satisfy the debt service obligations of the 15Service Boards entered into in compliance with the 16requirements of this Act. 17    (e) With respect to those taxes collected in DuPage, Kane, 18Lake, McHenry, and Will Counties and paid directly to the 19counties under Section 4.03, the county board County Board of 20each county shall use those amounts to fund operating and 21capital costs of public safety operations, facilities of 22county law enforcement, and public transportation services and 23or facilities and or to fund operating, capital, right-of-way, 24construction, and maintenance costs of other transportation 25purposes, including road, bridge, public safety, and transit 26purposes intended to improve mobility or reduce congestion in   SB2941- 9 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1the county. The funds shall be divided equally among all 2entities. The receipt of funding by such counties pursuant to 3this paragraph shall not be used as the basis for reducing any 4funds that such counties would otherwise have received from 5the State of Illinois, any agency or instrumentality thereof, 6the Authority, or the Service Boards.7    (f) The Authority by ordinance approved by a supermajority 8vote shall apportion to the Service Boards funds provided by 9the State of Illinois under Section 4.09(a)(1) as it shall 10determine and shall make payment of the amounts to each 11Service Board as soon as may be practicable upon their receipt 12provided the Authority has adopted a balanced budget as 13required by Section 4.01 and further provided the Service 14Board is in compliance with the requirements in Section 4.11. 15    (g) Beginning January 1, 2009, before making any payments, 16transfers, or expenditures under this Section to a Service 17Board, the Authority must first comply with Section 4.02a or 184.02b of this Act, whichever may be applicable. 19    (h) Moneys may be appropriated from the Public 20Transportation Fund to the Office of the Executive Inspector 21General for the costs incurred by the Executive Inspector 22General while serving as the inspector general for the 23Authority and each of the Service Boards. Beginning December 2431, 2012, and each year thereafter, the Office of the 25Executive Inspector General shall annually report to the 26General Assembly the expenses incurred while serving as the   SB2941- 10 -LRB104 18325 RTM 31765 b1inspector general for the Authority and each of the Service 2Boards. 3(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 4    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 5changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 6that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 7represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 8not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 9made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 10Public Act.